Maryland, session 2026, HB1478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
15–226.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1478*

HOUSE BILL 1478
(2) “Supplier” means a person that has supplied labor or materials to a
contractor in the prosecution of work provided for in a State procurement contract.
(3) “Undisputed amount” means an amount owed by a contractor to a
subcontractor or supplier for which there is no good faith dispute, including any retainage
withheld.
(c) (1) A contractor shall pay a subcontractor or supplier AT LEAST 95% OF
an undisputed amount to which the subcontractor or supplier is entitled within 10 days of
receiving a progress or final payment from the State.
(2) If a contractor withholds payment from a subcontractor or supplier,
within the time period in which payment normally would be made, the contractor shall:
(i) notify the subcontractor or supplier in writing and state the
reason why payment is being withheld; and
(ii) provide a copy of the notice to the procurement officer.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.